Wyoming, session 2025, HB0157.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxvii) and by creating a
new paragraph (lv), 22-3-102(a)(i), 22-3-103(a) by creating
a new paragraph (ix), 22-3-117(a)(intro) and
22-3-118(a)(ii) are amended to read:

HB0157

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0627
22-1-102. Definitions.

(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:

(xxvii) "Registration" is the entry and
verification of the name, citizenship and voter information
of a qualified elector on the official registry list, as
provided in W.S. 22-3-104(f) and 22-3-108;

(lv) "Proof of United States citizenship" means,
for purposes of voter registration, any of the following:

(A) A valid Wyoming driver's license as
defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxv) or Wyoming identification
card issued under W.S. 31-8-101, provided that the license
or identification card does not contain any indication that
the person is not a United States citizen;

HB0157

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0627
(B) A valid tribal identification card
issued by the governing body of the Eastern Shoshone tribe
of Wyoming, the Northern Arapaho tribe of Wyoming or other
federally recognized Indian tribe, provided that the
identification card does not contain any indication that
the person is not a United States citizen;

(C) A valid driver's license or
identification card issued by any other state that is
consistent with the requirements of the REAL ID Act as
defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(lii) that indicates the
applicant is a citizen of the United States;

(D) A valid United States passport;

(E) A certificate of United States
citizenship;

(F) A certificate of naturalization;

(G) A United States military draft record
or a selective service registration acknowledgment card;

HB0157

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0627
(H) A consular report of birth abroad
issued by the United States department of state;

(J) An original or certified copy of a
birth certificate in the United States bearing an official
seal.

22-3-102. Qualifications; temporary registration.

(a) A person may register to vote not less than
fourteen (14) days before an election, at any election
specified in W.S. 22-2-101(a)(i) through (viii) or as
provided by W.S. 22-3-117, who satisfies the following
qualifications:

(i) He is a citizen of the United States, as
evidenced by providing proof of United States citizenship
as defined by W.S. 22-1-102(a)(lv);

22-3-103. Furnishing of oath forms; contents thereof.

HB0157

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0627
(a) The county clerk shall furnish voter registration
oath forms to registry agents which forms shall require the
following voter information from the applicant:

(ix) Proof of United States citizenship as
defined by W.S. 22-1-102(a)(lv).

22-3-117. Absentee registration generally; use of
federal postcard.

(a) Notwithstanding any other section or provision in
this chapter, any citizen of the United States who is a
resident of Wyoming may apply for registration by providing
the information required by W.S. 22-3-103(a), proof of
United States citizenship and acceptable identification to
the county clerk and by completing and subscribing, the
form of voter registration oath prescribed by W.S.
22-3-103(b) before any person authorized by law to
administer oaths. Each county clerk shall furnish the voter
registration oath forms. The applicant shall mail or
return the completed voter registration oath form to the
county clerk in the county in which the applicant resides.
In order to vote in the next election, the application must
HB0157

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0627
be received in the county clerk's office before the close
of registration for that election, or:

22-3-118. Proof of identity.

(a) Unless a voter is challenged pursuant to W.S.
22-15-101 through 22-15-109, and except as provided in W.S.
22-9-104(a)(vi) for an absentee ballot obtained in person
by the elector, no identification shall be required when:

(ii) Voting by absentee ballot after having
registered by mail and having submitted a copy of the
person's acceptable identification, as set forth in W.S.
22-1-102(a)(xxxix)(A), and proof of United States
citizenship as defined by W.S. 22-1-102(a)(lv), at the time
of registration.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0157